Utah statutes.
4-23-5.   Board responsibilities -- Damage prevention policy -- Rules -- Methods to control predators and depredating birds and animals.

(1)  The board is responsible for the formulation of the agricultural and wildlife damage prevention policy of the state and in conjunction with its responsibility may, consistent with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, adopt rules to implement its policy which shall be administered by the department.

(2)  In its policy deliberations the board shall:

(a)  specify programs designed to prevent damage to livestock, poultry, and agricultural crops; and

(b)  specify methods for the prevention of damage and for the selective control of predators and depredating birds and animals including hunting, trapping, chemical toxicants, and the use of aircraft.

(3)  The board may also:

(a)  specify bounties on designated predatory animals and recommend procedures for the payment of bounty claims, recommend bounty districts, recommend persons not authorized to receive bounty, and recommend to the department other actions it considers advisable for the enforcement of its policies; and

(b)  cooperate with federal, state, and local governments, educational institutions, and private persons or organizations, through agreement or otherwise, to effectuate its policies.

